Rhode Island, session 2025, SB631.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 23-27.3-100.1.5.4 of the General Laws in Chapter 23-27.3 entitled
"State Building Code" is hereby amended to read as follows:
23-27.3-100.1.5.4. State energy conservation code.
(a) The state building code standards committee (“committee”) shall adopt an energy
conservation code that shall be based on appropriate nationally and internationally recognized
models, and shall promulgate and administer the energy conservation code. The energy
conservation code shall contain provisions pertaining to, but not limited to, the construction of
buildings, the use of renewable energy resources in buildings, the efficient use of energy within
buildings, and the orientation of buildings on their sites. The state energy conservation code shall
at a minimum:
(1) For residential or commercial buildings, meet or exceed the most recently published
International Energy Conservation Code (IECC), or achieve equivalent or greater energy savings.
The state building code standards committee shall revise the state energy conservation code to
comply with this requirement within one year of any update to the International Energy
Conservation Code; provided, however, that the 2021 IECC published by the International Code
Council shall not be adopted and the 2024 IECC published by the International Code Council shall
be adopted within (3) three months of its release; and provided further that, future versions of the
IECC published by the International Code Council between 2025-2029 shall only be adopted by
the state building code standards committee upon a state department of business regulation

determination, in conjunction with the state building code standards committee, that the particular
version of the IECC is more energy efficient that the version then in use in the state. The department
of business regulation shall make the determination within three (3) months of the release of any
update to the IECC between 2025-2029.
(2) Within one year of the release of the 2024 International Energy Conservation Code, the
state building code standards committee shall revise the state energy conservation code to meet or
exceed the 2024 International Energy Conservation Code’s electric readiness provisions.
(b) No later than six (6) months after the adoption of the building code(s) described in
subsection (a) of this section, the state building code standards committee shall develop a plan to
achieve compliance with the building code(s) described in subsection (a) of this section in at least
ninety percent (90%) of new and renovated residential and commercial building space in the state.
Such plan shall include active training and enforcement programs and measurement of the rate of
compliance each year.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002239
========
LC002239 - Page 2 of 3